src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/af/hyphenation/hyph_af.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.aa2n5s4
.aa2
.aan1
.aä7lawa
.a1ä
.aäla1w
.a6b2c-1b2
.a1b2
.ab1c2
.abc2-1
.a4b5la
.ab7sa1lo
.a2b1s2
.ab1sa
.a6b-ja
.ab2-1
.ab-1j
.ac7cra.
.a1c2
.a2c2c2
.a6fa2r1m
.a1fa
.af7ar2m.
.a6fee1t
.a1fe
.af7ee2t.
.a4f5en
.a6fe2t1s2
.afe1t
.af7et2s.
.a6foes2
.a1fo
.af7oe2s.
.a4f5oo2
.a4f5ra
.a1f2r
.af6ro'
.a4f3ro
.af6ro’
.a7fro's2
.a7fro’s2
.af6ro2-1
.a7fro-1h2
.a6fry.
.af3ry
.a2f3s2
.ag6aa2m1
.ag3aa2
.a1ga
.agte6r5
.a2g1t
.a6g5uur1
.a1gu
.aguu2
.a9ha.
.a1h2
.ah7le2rs2
.a2hl
.ah1le
.a3k2w
.a6lee2r
.a1le
.alee2
.al7ee2r.
.alf4
.al7fa1g2r
.al1fa
.al2f1ag
.al5f3r
.al6lda
.a2l1l
.all1d
.a4l3o
.al6oïe
.alo1ï
.a7loïen
.al3p
.al5s1t
.a2l1s2
.al7t6he1a
.al1t
.al2t1h2
.al7t6wee
.al2t1w
.al6zhe
.al1z
.alz1h2
.am2p4s2
.a2m
.a2m1p
.amp2s5w
.a6naër
.a1na
.ana1ë1
.an7aëro
.an6cp2l
.an1c2
.anc1p
.a2n1d4
.an5d2r
.a2ng4
.an5g1l
.an2gs5
.a4n5i1o
.a1ni
.an7thro
.a2n1t
.an2t1h2
.ant2hr
.a3p2r
.a2p
.ap7si3de
.a2p1s2
.ap4si2d
.ap1si
.a5rag
.a1ra
.ara6p.
.ara3p4
.ar7t6hur
.a2r1t
.ar2t1h2
.ar6zbe
.ar1z
.arz1b2
.as7ja2s.
.as2
.a1s1j
.a2sja
.asjas2
.a6sno1g
.as3no
.a1sn
.a6s9o2f.
.a1so
.a5s3ti
.as3t
.a7s4traa2
.ast2r
.a7s6tral
.at6hol
.a1t
.a2t1h2
.a7tho2l.
.a5t4s1j
.a2t1s2
.atte4
.a2t1t
.au7d6rey
.au4d3re
.au1d
.aud2r
.b6aa2n1v2
.b2
.baa2
.baan1
.ba6din
.ba2d
.ba3di
.ba4d5o
.ba7loi.
.ba4lo
.baloi1
.ba7ra2g1w
.ba1ra
.ba2rag
.ba7ri2n1s2
.ba1r2i
.ba6sek
.bas2
.ba1se
.ba7t4ho.
.ba1t
.ba2t1h2
.be7de2k1s2
.be3de
.be1d
.be6kaf
.be1ka
.bek7a2f.
.be5la
.be7lo2l.
.be1lo
.be4lol
.be7s3kos2
.be1s4k2
.bes2
.bes1ko
.be7thel
.be2t4h2
.be1t
.be7thul
.bi7s6ho.
.bis2
.bi2s1h2
.bis3ho
.b1li4
.blus5
.bo7k6erf
.bo2k1
.bo1ke
.bo7k6ies2
.boki2e4
.bo1ki
.bo7k6o2rs2
.bo1ko
.bo7m6aa1t1
.bo4m5aa2
.bo2m
.bo3ma
.b4on
.bo7p6laa2
.bo2p
.bop3l
.bo5ro
.bo7so2r.
.bo2s2
.bo4sor
.bo1so
.bo5s4ta
.bos3t
.bo7tri2t
.bo2t
.bot2r
.bot1r2i
.bo7tswa
.bo2t1s2
.bot2s1w
.bo7u6i2t.
.bou1i
.boui2t
.bout5j
.bou2t
.b4re
.bu6e1no
.bu1e
.bu6lol
.bu1lo
.bu7t6hel
.bu2t
.bu2t1h2
.by6ld2r
.by1
.byl1d
.by6lho
.byl1h2
.by6l1ne
.byl1n
.by6lpi
.byl1p
.by7po2r1t
.by2p
.by3s4
.by6tal
.by2t
.by3ta
.ca7t4hy.
.c2
.ca2t4h2
.ca1t
.ca7y4en1n
.cay1e
.chlo7e.
.c1h2
.c2hl
.ci6rca
.ci1r
.cir1c2
.ci7trus2
.ci2t
.cit2r
.co4s7ta.
.cos3t
.cos4ta
.cos2
.cy6p1r2i
.cy2p
.cy3p2r
.d2
.da7go2n.
.da2g
.da1go
.da2g5s2
.da6ka1t
.da1ka
.da6koo2
.da1ko
.da7t4a1ge
.da4tag
.da1t
.da6tji
.da3t4j
.dat7jie
.da6w1ki
.da1w
.de6k7laa2
.de1k2l
.de6klo
.de6kwe
.de1k2w
.de5la
.de7ro1ga
.de4ro
.dero1g
.de6sal
.des2
.de1sa
.de6sok
.de1so
.de4s1p
.die4p5l
.die1p
.di6j2k1s2
.di1j
.di4si
.dis2
.di7t6hak
.di2t
.di2t1h2
.do4m5a
.do2m
.do4m5o
.dor7ste.
.dor4s1t
.do2rs2
.dr6oef
.d2r
.du2n5s3
.du6p1re
.du1p
.dup2r
.dut5j
.du2t
.dy7spie
.dys2
.dys1p
.e6b9cu.
.e1b2
.eb1c2
.ed5wa
.e2d2w
.e1d
.ed7wi2n.
.eer6sk2
.ee2r
.ee2rs2
.ee4t
.e6fron
.e1f2r
.ef7ro2n.
.eg7go1fo
.e2g1g2
.eg1go
.eg2g1of
.e6indu
.ei2n1d
.ei5s3t
.eis2
.ek4s5k2
.e2k1s2
.ek7so3pa
.ek1so
.ek2s1o2p
.ek7sor1d
.eks7t1r2i
.eks1t
.ekst2r
.eks7tro
.en7dres2
.e2n1d
.en4d3re
.end2r
.e2n1k4
.en5k2l
.e6no2f1t
.e1no
.en7ofta
.en4t5j
.e2n1t
.en7to2p1t
.en4to2p
.ep7s6o2m1s2
.e1p
.e2p1s2
.ep1so
.epso2m
.er4d5a
.er1d
.er6dwo
.er3d1w
.er6f2le
.er6foo2
.er1fo
.er6i2n1v2
.e1r2i
.e2r1n4
.e2r4t4
.er5te
.ert5j
.ert7se.
.er2t1s2
.ert1se
.ert2s5w
.e2s2
.e9s2au
.e1sa
.e4s3k2
.e3so
.e1s3p
.es8p.
.es6pma
.es2p1m
.e1s3t
.es6tco
.est1c2
.es6t1ni
.es2t1n
.es5t2r
.e7t4age.
.e4t3ag
.e1t
.et4a1ge
.et4sn
.e2t1s2
.eu4r5a
.eu7s6ta1c2
.eus3t
.eus2
.ex7odus2
.exo1d
.e6z9ra.
.e1z
.f2
.fo6ch1v2
.fo1c2
.foc1h2
.fo6w1le
.fo1w
.f4r2i
.f2r
.fy6tji
.fy2t
.fy3t2j
.g2
.ga7la1ge
.ga1la
.ga2lag
.ga7l4a1go
.ga6la2p
.ga6loo2
.ga1lo
.g6arbo
.g3ar1b2
.ga6sen
.gas2
.ga1se
.ge7da2r1t
.ge3d
.ge3g2
.ge7ge2k1s2
.ge3ge
.ge7g6u2il
.ge4g3ui
.ge1gu
.ge3kun5
.ge1ku
.geku2n2s6
.ge5la
.ge7m6o2p1p
.ge2m3o2p
.ge1m
.ge7mui2t
.ge7nève2
.genè1v2
.ge7r6o2g1g2
.ge1ro
.gero1g
.ges4
.ge7sja1b2
.ge2s1j
.ge2sja
.ge7sjar
.ge5s4k2
.ge5so
.ge4s7pe.
.ge3s1p
.ge7spe2r.
.ge4sper
.ge7steg
.ge3s1t
.gif3
.gi7g4a1g2r
.gi1ga
.gi2g1ag
.gi6sen
.gis2
.gi1se
.g1ly3
.gly5k
.g6ly2n1a
.g3lyn
.g4oo2
.gou7d6a.
.gou4d3
.gr6äbe
.g2r
.gr1ä
.grä1b2
.g6ruba
.g3ru1b2
.gui7d6o.
.gui4d3o
.gui2d
.han2g5s2
.h2
.ha2ng
.he6blu
.he1b2
.he6gor
.he1go
.he6gra
.he1g2r
.h6ei2n1d
.he4k5o
.he7r6a2k3l
.he2r
.he1r3a
.he6r5en
.he3re
.he6w1le
.he1w
.hi8v.
.hi1v2
.ho6fe1t
.ho1fe
.ho6laa2
.ho1la
.ho6loo2
.ho1lo
.hooi5
.hoo2
.ho7taze
.ho4ta
.ho2t
.hota1z
.ho4t5o
.hy6gro
.hy1g
.hy1g2r
.ic7te1ru
.i1c2
.i2c1t
.i4g1l
.ile7u2s.
.i1le
.ileus2
.i2n1
.i9n8a.
.i1na
.in6a1r2i
.i7narie
.i2n1d4
.in7dwar
.in2d1w
.i2ng4
.in5g2r
.in5g1w
.in6i3ti
.i3ni
.ini2t
.in5k2l
.i2n1k
.in6k3ly
.in5k2n
.in5k2w
.in6o3si
.i1no
.inos2
.i7no3sie
.i2n3s4
.in7snee2
.in4s1ne
.in1sn
.in7t6wyf
.i2n1t
.in2t1w
.i5raa2
.i1r
.i3sa
.is2
.i4s3k2
.i3so
.ja6g1li
.jag1l
.jah7we.
.ja1h2
.ja2h1w
.ja6spa
.jas3p
.jas2
.ja7ta1ga
.ja4tag
.ja1t
.j6ä3ger
.j1ä
.jä1ge
.je7so2p1p
.jes2
.je1so
.je2s1o2p
.jo7do1fo
.jo1d
.jo2dof
.jo7s6a1fa
.jos2
.jo1sa
.jo2s3af
.ju6kos2
.ju1ko
.juk7o2s.
.j6ü6r1ge
.j1ü1
.jür1g
.jy6sel
.jys2
.jy1se
.k2
.kaar4
.kaa2
.ka3de4
.ka2d
.kade1t5
.k4af
.kaï7ro.
.ka1ï
.ka7n6o2n1t
.ka1no
.ka6pla
.ka2p
.kap3l
.ka7p6lak
.k6arbe
.kar1b2
.ka7t6har
.ka1t
.ka2t1h2
.ka7t6hu.
.ka6to1ë
.kat7oë.
.ka6tui
.ke6p1le
.ke1p
.kep2l
.ker6k5a
.ke2r1k
.ker6k5l
.ker4k5r
.ker6sa
.ke2rs2
.ker6sl
.ker6s5p
.ke4s5t
.kes2
.kie6s1t
.ki2e
.kies2
.ki6p1li
.ki2p
.ki3p2l
.ki4r
.kit7se.
.ki2t4s2
.ki2t
.kit1se
.k4la
.k2l
.k6leyn
.k1le
.k3ley
.k4li
.kli4p5
.knik5
.k2n
.k1ni
.kn6o2p1n
.k4no2p
.k1no
.ko6maa2
.ko2m
.ko3ma
.ko6m1af
.k4o2p
.ko3pe4
.ko3pe1r7a
.kop4er
.ko6pla
.kop3l
.ko4p5o
.ko7ra2g.
.ko1ra
.ko2rag
.kor6s1t
.ko2rs2
.kors7te.
.k6ra2k.
.k2r
.kr6ü1ge
.kr1ü1
.kry2t5
.ku7mo2n.
.ku2m
.k4we
.k2w
.k4wo
.ky7oto2p
.kyo2t
.kyo3to
.l'7etji
.l'e1t
.l'et2j
.l’7etji
.l’e1t
.l’et2j
.la6eti
.la1e
.lae1t
.la6kwa
.la2k3w
.la5sa
.las2
.lei5s4
.le4k7oë.
.le1ko
.le3ko1ë
.le6poo2
.le1p
.le5p2r
.le7s6ha1b2
.les2
.le2s1h2
.les3ha
.le6son
.le1so
.le4s1p
.le3s5t
.le6suu2
.le1su
.li1g5e
.li4gi
.li6go2m
.li1go
.li6g1re
.li1g2r
.li7pa1se
.li4pa
.li2p
.lipas2
.l6loy2d
.l1l
.lo6c2hn
.lo1c2
.loc1h2
.lof7ui.
.lo4fui
.lo1fu
.lo6g1lê1
.lo1g
.log1l
.l6on2t1d
.lo2n1t
.lo4s5k2
.los2
.lu6gen
.lu2g1
.lu1ge
.lui5s3l
.luis2
.l6üder
.l1ü1
.lü1d
.m2
.m'7etji
.m'e1t
.m'et2j
.m’7etji
.m’e1t
.m’et2j
.ma6cdo
.ma1c2
.mac1d
.ma6nal
.ma1na
.ma6nur
.ma1nu
.ma7s6tek2
.mas3t
.mas2
.ma7t6hes2
.ma1t
.ma2t1h2
.ma6zda
.ma1z
.maz1d
.mel6k5a
.mel1k
.mel6k5l
.mer6k5l
.me2r1k
.me2s5m
.mes2
.me4s1w
.me6te1m
.me3te
.me1t
.mi6dos2
.mi2d
.mi3do
.mi6rba
.mi1r
.mir1b2
.mi7traa2
.mi2t
.mit2r
.m4ne
.m1n
.mo7d6ja2d
.mo1d
.mo2d1j
.mo7f6la2m
.mof3l
.mo6sin
.mo3si
.mos2
.mo4s1k2
.mu4e
.my6nen
.my1ne
.my6n5in
.my1ni
.my7un2is2
.myu1ni
.n2
.n6aa2n1d
.n3aan1
.naa2
.na5f3l
.n1af
.na6gro
.na1g2r
.na7groe
.na7s6maa2
.na2s3m
.nas2
.nas3ma
.na7s6tor
.nas3t
.na7uu2rs2
.n2au
.nauu2
.nauur1
.ne4k5a
.ne4k5o
.ne6k1r2i
.ne1k2r
.ne3k7rin
.ne6k1ys2
.ne1ky
.ne4s3
.ne7ser1h2
.ne3se
.nes4er
.n6etik
.ne1t
.ne4t5j
.ne6tru
.net2r
.ne6wca
.ne1w
.new1c2
.ne6w1fo
.ne6wla
.ne6wma
.new1m
.ni4e
.ni6jho
.ni1j
.nij1h2
.ni6rva
.ni1r
.nir1v2
.nix7o2n.
.n6ko1sa
.n1k
.n1ko
.n3kos2
.noe1t4
.noe5t3j
.no6gee
.no1g
.no1ge
.no4k
.n6ondu
.n3o2n1d
.nu4l
.ny7lo2n1t
.ny1lo
.oe5k2r
.oe4r
.oe7ral1g
.oe1ra
.oe7ra2ng
.oer7o2s.
.oe1ro
.oeros2
.oe4s3
.o4g1l
.o1g
.oh7ri2gs2
.o1h2
.o2hr
.oh1r2i
.o6kla1h2
.o1k2l
.ok7laho
.o4l6i4eu
.o1li
.o7li4e3ui
.o2m1s4
.o2m
.o2n1
.ond6ui
.o2n1d
.on7d5ui2t
.o6nemo
.o1ne
.o3ne1m
.on6ias2
.o1ni
.oni1a
.o7nia2s.
.o2n3k
.on7pa2r1m
.o2n1p
.o2n3s4
.on6s3he
.on2s1h2
.on6s3se
.on2s2s2
.on6t7ee2r
.o2n1t
.on6t5er
.on4t2r
.ont7ras2
.on4t5r2i
.o9nus2
.o1nu
.on6u2s.
.oon4
.oo2
.oon7de.
.oo2n1d
.o4o2p1
.oo2r5n
.oor1
.oo2r5s4
.oo4s2
.o6pee1t3
.o2p
.o3pe
.opee2
.op7ee2t.
.o6p9e2g.
.o6pein
.o3pei
.o6p5er1d
.op4er
.o4pof
.o3po
.o4p3r
.op5ra
.o2p1s4
.op7smuk
.op2s3m
.ops3mu
.o7ra5gie
.o1ra
.o2rag
.ora3gi
.or6k1ne
.o2r1k
.or1k2n
.o3ro
.orto5
.o2r1t
.o4s1k2
.os2
.os5ko
.os7oo2g.
.o1so
.o4soo1g3
.osoo2
.ot6hel
.o2t
.o4the
.o2t1h2
.o7the2l1l
.ou6doo2
.ou1d
.ou7nôi.
.ounô1
.ounô2i
.ou5t2j
.ou2t
.p2
.pa4d3
.pa7d6ie.
.pa3di
.pa6vlo
.pa1v2
.pe5la
.pel6sk2
.pe2l1s2
.per6s1t
.pe2rs2
.pe4sk2
.pes2
.pe4s1t
.pie6t2j
.pie1t
.pi7la2f.
.p2il
.pi1la
.pi2laf
.pi2t5s2
.pi2t
.p4la
.p2l
.po6dzo
.po1d
.pod1z
.p6oe1fe
.poen4
.p6on2t1w
.po2n1t
.po6sa2d
.pos2
.po1sa
.p4re
.p2r
.pu6ta2d
.pu2t
.pu3ta
.py6paa2
.py2p
.py3pa
.py6pla
.pyp3l
.py6pol
.pyp3o
.py4p5r
.py7t6hon
.py2t
.py2t1h2
.r2
.r'7etji
.r'e1t
.r'et2j
.r’7etji
.r’e1t
.r’et2j
.r6aar1d
.raa2
.ra7da2r1t
.ra2d
.ra3da
.rada4r
.ra6seg
.ras2
.ra1se
.ras7e2g.
.re7au3mu
.re1a
.re2au
.reau2m
.re6gru
.re1g2r
.re2k5s2
.re6mas2
.re1m
.rem7a2s.
.re6mco
.rem1c2
.re4sl
.res2
.rie4t
.r2i
.riet5j
.riet5r
.ri6p1le
.ri2p
.ri3p2l
.roc7ky.
.ro1c2
.ro2ck
.ro6gak
.ro1g
.ro1ga
.ron7d6o.
.ron4d5o
.ro2n1d
.ron2d5s4
.ro5py
.ro2p
.ros5t
.ros2
.ro6t3re
.ro3t2r
.ro2t
.ro6w1li
.ro1w
.ru7k6li4p3
.ru2k3
.ru1k2l
.ruk1li
.ru1k4o
.ru7ko3pe
.ruko2p
.ru7s4taa2
.rus3t
.rus2
.ru6suu2
.ru1su
.ry4k5a
.ry6ste
.ry3s3t
.rys2
.s6aa2n1s2
.s2
.s3aan1
.saa2
.s4af
.s4ag
.sa7g6o3pa
.s4a1go
.sa2g1o2p
.s6akty
.s3a2k1t
.s4a2m
.sa6vlo
.sa1v2
.s4ca
.s1c2
.se6a2n.
.se1a
.see5ra
.see2r
.see7y2s.
.seeys2
.se7k6huk
.se2k1h2
.se6laa2
.se1la
.se6l5o2p
.se1lo
.se7re3ni
.se1re
.se6s1le
.s2es2
.se1sl
.se4s5t
.se6suu2
.se1su
.se6ta2p
.se1t
.se4t2r
.sex5y
.s6fa1le
.s1f2
.s3fa
.s4fi
.s4g2r
.s1g
.s4ha4
.s1h2
.s4he
.s4hi
.s4ho
.s4hu
.s4in
.s2i6nes2
.si1ne
.si7p6ho.
.si2p
.si2p1h2
.si7ra2g.
.si1r
.si2rag
.s4ja
.s1j
.s4ka
.sk2
.s4ke
.s4k2l
.s4ko
.s4k2r
.s4ku
.s4la4g5
.s4ma
.s1m
.s4me
.s4mi
.s4mo
.s4mu
.s6na2g3s2
.s3na4g
.s1na
.s4ne
.so1d4
.so7da1fa
.so2d1af
.so7dwan
.so2d1w
.s2o7i6e2t1s2
.soi1
.soie1t
.so6ko2p
.so1ko
.s4o3me4
.so2m
.s6om2s.
.s3o2m1s2
.s4on
.so6n5eg
.s4o1ne
.s4o2p
.so6pek
.so3pe
.so7p6hok
.so2p1h2
.s2o7ro2s2s2
.soros2
.s4pe
.s1p
.s4p2l
.spo4g
.s6pren
.sp2r
.sp1re
.s4py
.s8ri.
.s1r
.s3r2i
.s4ta
.s1t
.s6te2m1p
.ste1m
.ste7rol
.ste1ro
.ster6ta
.s1te2r1t
.ster6t7j
.s4ti
.s4to
.s4traf5
.st2r
.s6tr4ei
.st1re
.s6tuar
.s3tu1a
.stu4c5
.su7bie1t
.su2b2
.sub5m
.sub5p
.su8e.
.su1e
.s4ui
.su5k2r
.su7t6he2r
.su2t
.su2t1h2
.su7tra.
.sut2r
.s4we
.s1w
.s4wi
.s4wo
.sy1
.sy6lvi
.syl1v2
.sy7n6a1g2r
.sy2n1a
.sy7s4la4g
.sy2s3l
.sys2
.t2
.t6af1sy
.t3a2f1s2
.t4ag
.tee5k
.te6flo
.te1fl
.te7r6a1fi
.te4r5af
.te1ra
.te7r4a1g2r
.te2r3ag
.ter6t2j
.te2r1t
.tert7ji
.te4s5t
.tes2
.te7s6tu1d
.ti6e1ne
.tie6t5j
.tie1t
.ti4k
.ti6ner
.ti1ne
.t6jaai1
.t2j
.t3jaa2
.tjo4k5
.toe7y2s.
.toeys2
.to6kla
.to1k2l
.to7ky7o.
.to6lun
.to1lu
.to7ro2n1t
.tou3
.trap5r
.t2r
.tra2p
.trek5
.t1re
.tre4s2
.trie4
.t1r2i
.tries5
.t4sa
.t1s2
.t2s4h2
.ts6jaa2
.t1s1j
.t2sja
.ty6daa2
.ty2d
.ty3da
.ty6dor
.ty6dra
.tyd3r
.ui6laa2
.u2il
.ui1la
.ui4t3
.ui5ti
.ui5t6ji
.uit3j
.um7hlan
.u2m
.u2m1h2
.um2hl
.u2n2s4
.un5s1t
.u5raa2
.u1ra
.u5tra
.u2t
.ut2r
.va6ka2d
.v2
.va1ka
.va6kei
.va1ke
.va6n1af
.va1na
.va4n5o
.va7raan1
.va1ra
.varaa2
.va6sen
.vas2
.va1se
.va6swa
.va2s3w
.vas7y2s.
.va4s2ys2
.va1sy
.ve7ci1no
.ve2
.ve1c2
.ve7laar
.ve1la
.velaa2
.ve7la1re
.ve7lê2r.
.ve1lê1
.ve7loer
.ve1lo
.ve7lo3me
.velo2m
.ve7me2ng
.ve1m
.ve7r6ema
.ver1
.ve1re
.vere1m
.ve7r6e1na
.ve7r6eve2
.vere1v2
.ve7skaf
.ves2
.ve1sk2
.ves1ka
.ve7to1re
.ve1t
.vlas5
.vo6gin
.vo1g
.vo1gi
.vo6ly1w
.vo1ly
.vo6s1ko
.vo1s1k2
.vos2
.wa7gh1r2i
.wa2g1h2
.wag2hr
.wa4n
.wa7s6mou
.wa2s3m
.was2
.wa6spa
.was3p
.we4b5m
.we1b2
.we4bo
.we6b-o
.web2-1
.week7lan
.wee2k
.wee1k2l
.wee4t5
.we6kuu2
.we1ku
.we4l5a
.we6lin
.we3li
.wel7i2ng
.we6nan
.we1na
.wer4k5l
.we2r1k
.wer6k5r
.we4s5k2
.wes2
.we6soe
.we1so
.we6swa
.we3s1w
.w8hê.
.w1h2
.whê1
.w4hi
.wi6i2d.
.wi1i
.wii2d
.wi2n1s5
.wi4p
.wi4t
.wî9e.
.wy7k6was2
.wy2k3w
.wy7n6a2n1d
.wy2n1a
.wy6ne1t
.wy1ne
.x2
.y6amin
.y1a
.ya2m
.ya3mi
.y6an1ni
.yan1n
.y6asu1d
.yas2
.ya1su
.yk7loon1
.y2k2l
.ykloo2
.ys3
.ys6e1re
.y1se
.ys5la
.y2s3l
.ze5us2
.z6üri1c2
.z1ü1
.zü1r2i
.z4wa
.z1w
.z4wi
aa2
aa2d1
aa4da
aa4de
aa4do
aa4d3r
aaf7emme
aa1fe
aafe1m
aafe2m1m
aaf6sa1t
aa2f1s2
aaf1sa
aag5al
aa1ga
aag7ase1m
aagas2
aaga1se
aag7elas2
aa1ge
aage1la
aa1g3r
aag7ro2n1d
aag4ron
aag5s4l
aa2gs2
aag5s3p
aag5s4t
aag7s6wee
aag2s3w
